Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3237
Districts; weather modification programs; authorized.

A natural resources district may establish weather modification programs. A district may enter into agreements with companies, service organizations, municipalities, political subdivisions, public or private postsecondary educational institutions, or state or federal agencies to establish or participate in such programs.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 11.